Utah statutes.
63M-11-203.   Duties and powers of commission.

(1)  The commission shall:

(a)  fulfill the commission's purposes as listed in Section 63M-11-102;

(b)  facilitate the communication and coordination of public and private entities that provide services to the aging population;

(c)  study, evaluate, and report on the status and effectiveness of policies, procedures, and programs that provide services to the aging population;

(d)  study and evaluate the policies, procedures, and programs implemented by other states that address the needs of the aging population;

(e)  facilitate and conduct the research and study of issues related to aging;

(f)  provide a forum for public comment on issues related to aging;

(g)  provide public information on the aging population and the services available to the aging population;

(h)  facilitate the provision of services to the aging population from the public and private sectors; and

(i)  encourage state and local governments to analyze, plan, and prepare for the impacts of the aging population on services and operations.

(2)  To accomplish its duties, the commission may:

(a)  request and receive from any state or local governmental agency or institution, summary information relating to the aging population, including:

(i)  reports;

(ii)  audits;

(iii)  projections; and

(iv)  statistics;

(b)  apply for and accept grants or donations for uses consistent with the duties of the commission from public or private sources; and

(c)  appoint special committees to advise and assist the commission.

(3)  All funds received under Subsection (2)(b) shall be:

(a)  accounted for and expended in compliance with the requirements of federal and state law; and

(b)  continuously available to the commission to carry out the commission's duties.

(4) (a)  Members of a special committee described in Subsection (2)(c):

(i)  shall be appointed by the commission;

(ii)  may be:

(A)  members of the commission; or

(B)  individuals from the private or public sector; and

(iii)  notwithstanding Section 63M-11-206, shall not receive any reimbursement or pay for any work done in relation to the special committee.

(b)  A special committee described in Subsection (2)(c) shall report to the commission on the progress of the special committee.

(5)  This chapter does not diminish the planning authority conferred on state, regional, and local governments by existing law.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

